Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.100

Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one minor, and only one person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under this chapter by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

[ 1991 c 193 s 10.]